tests/Турку.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах Турку":
    Турку<np><top><nom> :  Турку 
    Турку<np><top><gen> :  Туркӑн 
    Турку<np><top><dat> :  Туркӑна 
    Турку<np><top><loc> :  Туркӑра 
    Турку<np><top><abl> :  Туркӑран 
    Турку<np><top><ins> :  Туркӑпа 
    Турку<np><top><abe> :  Туркӑсӑр 
    Турку<np><top><ben> :  Туркӑшӑн
    Турку<np><top><px1sg><nom> :  Туркӑм 
    Турку<np><top><px1sg><gen> :  Туркӑмӑн 
    Турку<np><top><px1sg><dat> :  Туркӑма 
    Турку<np><top><px1sg><loc> :  Туркӑмра 
    Турку<np><top><px1sg><abl> :  Туркӑмран 
    Турку<np><top><px1sg><ins> :  Туркӑмпа 
    Турку<np><top><px1sg><abe> :  Туркӑмсӑр 
    Турку<np><top><px1sg><ben> :  Туркӑмшӑн
    Турку<np><top><px2sg><nom> :  Турку 
    Турку<np><top><px2sg><gen> :  Туркун 
    Турку<np><top><px2sg><dat> :  Туркуна 
    Турку<np><top><px2sg><loc> :  Туркунта 
    Турку<np><top><px2sg><abl> :  Туркунтан 
    Турку<np><top><px2sg><ins> :  Туркупа 
    Турку<np><top><px2sg><abe> :  Туркусӑр 
    Турку<np><top><px2sg><ben> :  Туркушӑн
    Турку<np><top><px3sp><nom> :  Турки 
    Турку<np><top><px3sp><gen> :  Туркин 
    Турку<np><top><px3sp><dat> :  Туркине 
    Турку<np><top><px3sp><loc> :  Туркинче 
    Турку<np><top><px3sp><abl> :  Туркинчен 
    Турку<np><top><px3sp><ins> :  Туркипе 
    Турку<np><top><px3sp><abe> :  Туркисӗр 
    Турку<np><top><px3sp><ben> :  Туркишӗн
    Турку<np><top><px1pl><nom> :  Туркӑмӑр 
    Турку<np><top><px1pl><gen> :  Туркӑмӑрӑн 
    Турку<np><top><px1pl><dat> :  Туркӑмӑра 
    Турку<np><top><px1pl><loc> :  Туркӑмӑрта 
    Турку<np><top><px1pl><abl> :  Туркӑмӑртан 
    Турку<np><top><px1pl><ins> :  Туркӑмӑрпа 
    Турку<np><top><px1pl><abe> :  Туркӑмӑрсӑр 
    Турку<np><top><px1pl><ben> :  Туркӑмӑршӑн
    Турку<np><top><px2pl><nom> :  Туркӑр 
    Турку<np><top><px2pl><gen> :  Туркӑрӑн 
    Турку<np><top><px2pl><dat> :  Туркӑра 
    Турку<np><top><px2pl><loc> :  Туркӑрта 
    Турку<np><top><px2pl><abl> :  Туркӑртан 
    Турку<np><top><px2pl><ins> :  Туркӑрпа 
    Турку<np><top><px2pl><abe> :  Туркӑрсӑр 
    Турку<np><top><px2pl><ben> :  Туркӑршӑн
